test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_caallid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - čäälliđ: # 
    čäälliđ+V+Inf: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čálám
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čáláh
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáálá
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čälleen
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čälivettee
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čäälliv
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čäällip
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čälivetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čäälih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čaallim
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čaallih
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čaalij
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čaalijm
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čaalijn
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čaalijm
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čaalijd
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čallii
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čáláččim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čáláččih
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čáláččij
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du1: čáláččáim
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du2: čáláččáid
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Du3: čáláččáin
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čáláččijm
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čáláččijd
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čáláččii
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čääleem
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čääleeh
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čaališ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du1: čaaližeen        #čaližeen?
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du2: čaališvettee
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Du3: čaaližává        #čaližává?
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čaaližep         #čaližep?
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čaališvetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+Pl3: čaaližeh         #čaližeh
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: čállum
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čääli
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čálus
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čálloon
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čällee
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čáállus
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čáállup
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čáállus
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čääli
    čäälliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čáállâm
    čäälliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: čáláččii
    čäälliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: čááláá
    čäälliđ+V+PrsPrc: čäällee
    čäälliđ+V+PrfPrc: čáállám
    čäälliđ+V+Actio: čäällim
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ess: čälimin
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Loc: čälimist
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Ill: čälimân
    čäälliđ+V+Actio+Com: čälidijn
    čäälliđ+V+VAbess: čälihánnáá

  Verb - celkkiđ: # 
    celkkiđ+V+Inf: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ciälháh
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciälkká
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: celkkeen
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: celkkivettee
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: celkkiv
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: celkkip
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: celkkivetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ceelhij
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: celhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: celhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: celhijn
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ceelhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ceelhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: celkkii
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: ciälháččim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: ciälháččih
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: ciälháččij
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du1: ciälháččáim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du2: ciälháččáid
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Du3: ciälháččáin
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: ciälháččijm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: ciälháččijd
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: ciälháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: celheem
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: celheeh
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: ceelhiš
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du1: celhižeen
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du2: ceelhišvettee
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du3: celhižává
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: celhižep
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: ceelhišvetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: celhižeh
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: ciälkkum
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ciälhus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ciälkkoon
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ciälkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ciälkkup
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ciälkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ciälkkâm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: ciälháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ciälhháá
    celkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: ciälkkám
    celkkiđ+V+Actio: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: celkkimin
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: celkkimist
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: celkkimân
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Com: celhidijn
    celkkiđ+V+VAbess: celhihánnáá


  Verb - peehiđ: # 
    peehiđ+V+Inf: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävám
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piäváh
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piävá
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pehheen
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pehivettee
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peehiv
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: peehip
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pehivetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peevij
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pevvijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pevvijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pevvijn
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pevvijm       #peevijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pevvijd       #peevijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pehhii
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: piäváččim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: piäváččih
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: piäváččij
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du1: piäváččáim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du2: piäváččáid
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Du3: piäváččáin
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: piäváččijm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: piäváččijd
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: piäváččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pevveem
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pevveeh
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: peeviš
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du1: pevižeen
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du2: peevišvettee
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du3: pevižává
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: pevižep
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: peevišvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: pevižeh
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: piähhum
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: peevi
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: piävus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: piähhoon
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: piähus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: piähhup
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: piähus
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peevi
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: piähâm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: piäváččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: piävváá
    peehiđ+V+PrsPrc: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+PrfPrc: piähám
    peehiđ+V+Actio: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ess: pehimin
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Loc: pehimist
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ill: pehimân
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Com: pevidijn
    peehiđ+V+VAbess: pevihánnáá


  Verb - uáđđiđ: # 
    uáđđiđ+V+Inf: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uáđáh
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáđá
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uáđđeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uáđivettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uáđđiv
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uáđđip
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uáđivetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uáđih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oođđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oođđih
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oođij
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oođijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oođijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oođijn
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oođijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oođijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ođđii
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: uáđáččim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: uáđáččih
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: uáđáččij
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du1: uáđáččáim
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du2: uáđáččáid
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Du3: uáđáččáin
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: uáđáččijm
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: uáđáččijd
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: uáđáččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: uáđeem
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: uáđeeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: oođiš
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du1: ođižeen
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du2: oođišvettee
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Du3: ođižává
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: ođižep
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: oođišvetteđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: ođižeh
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: uáđđum
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uáđi
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uáđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uáđđoon
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uáđđee
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uáđđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uáđđup
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uáđđiđ
    uáđđiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uáđđus
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uáđi
    uáđđiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uáđđâm
    uáđđiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: uáđáččii
    uáđđiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: uáđáá
    uáđđiđ+V+PrsPrc: uáđđee
    uáđđiđ+V+PrfPrc: uáđđám
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio: uáđđim
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ess: uáđimin
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Loc: uáđimist
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Ill: uáđimân
    uáđđiđ+V+Actio+Com: uáđidijn
    uáđđiđ+V+VAbess: uáđihánnáá


  Verb - vyeijiđ: # ML checked
    vyeijiđ+V+Inf: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuájám
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuájáh
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyájá
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyeijeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyejivettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyeijiv
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyeijip
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyejivetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyejih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuoijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuoijih
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuojij
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuojijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuojijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuojijn
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuojijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuojijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuoijii
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: vuájáččim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: vuájáččih
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: vuájáččij
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du1: vuájáččáim
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du2: vuájáččáid
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Du3: vuájáččáin
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: vuájáččijm
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: vuájáččijd
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: vuájáččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: vyejeem
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: vyejeeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: vuojiš
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du1: vuojižeen
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du2: vuojišvettee
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Du3: vuojižává
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: vuojižep
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: vuojišvetteđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: vuojižeh
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vuáijum
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyeje
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuájus
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuáijoon
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyeijee
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuáijus
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuáijup
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyeijiđ
    vyeijiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuáijus
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyeje
    vyeijiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuáijám
    vyeijiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuájáččii
    vyeijiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuojiš
    vyeijiđ+V+PrsPrc: vyeijee
    vyeijiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuáijám
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio: vyeijim
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyejimin
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyejimist
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Ill: vyejimân
    vyeijiđ+V+Actio+Com: vyejedijn
    vyeijiđ+V+VAbess: vyejehánnáá
    


  Verb - kästiđ: # ML checked
